languages/apertium-cym/apertium-cym.cym.dix
        <p>
          <l>uer</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/aro__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aro</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawa</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawed</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawn</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawch</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawent</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawer</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawn</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawit</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawai</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawem</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawech</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawent</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawid</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawais</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawaist</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawodd</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawsom</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawsoch</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawsant</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawyd</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawswn</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawsit</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawsai</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawsem</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawsech</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawsent</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawsid</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawaf</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawi</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawa</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawn</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawch</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawant</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawir</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawyf</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawych</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawo</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawom</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawoch</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawont</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rawer</l>
          <r>aro<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="taro"><par n="initial-t"/><par n="t/aro__vblex"/></e>
